Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,101
Teachers; solicitation by agents or salespersons; violation; penalty.

Any person or persons who violate the purpose and intent of the provisions of section 79-8,100 shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 86, § 2, p. 339;

C.S.1929, § 79-2134;

R.S.1943, § 79-2142;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 373, p. 816;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 259;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1273;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 526.